Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-1739
Collection of taxes; personal property; taxes delinquent for ten years; cancellation of interest on payment of principal.

All personal property taxes of any taxpayer that are delinquent for more than ten years shall be canceled upon the payment of the principal of such taxes, without interest, if all other taxes of such taxpayer in that county, due subsequent thereto, have been paid in full.

Laws 1921, c. 218, § 1, p. 793;

C.S.1922, § 6022;

C.S.1929, § 77-1927;

Laws 1943, c. 177, § 1, p. 621;

R.S.1943, § 77-1739;

Laws 2000, LB 968, § 69;

Laws 2026, LB834, § 23.
July 18, 2026